Missouri, session 2026, SB1284.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 247.220, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 247.220,
to read as follows:
247.220. 1. Proceedings for the dissolution of a
public water supply district shall be substantially the same
as proceedings for the formation of such a district, as
follows: A petition describing the boundaries of the
district sought to be dissolved shall be filed with the
clerk of the circuit court of the county wherein the subject
district is situate, or with the clerk of the circuit court
of the county having the largest acreage within the
boundaries of the subject district, in the event that the
subject district embraces lands in more than one county.
Such petition, in addition to such boundary description,
shall allege that further operation of the subject district
is inimicable to the best interests of the inhabitants of
the district, that the district should, in the interest of
the public welfare and safety, be dissolved, that an
alternative water supplier is available and better able to
supply water to the inhabitants of the district, that an
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1284 2
agreement for sale of the district's assets has been entered
into by the board of directors contingent upon approval of
the circuit court and voters, and such other information as
may be useful to the court in determining whether the
petition should be granted and a decree of dissolution
entered. Such petition shall also include a detailed plan
for payment of all debt and obligations of the district at
the time of dissolution. Such petition shall be accompanied
by a cash deposit of fifty dollars as an advancement of the
costs of the proceeding and the petition shall be signed by
not less than one-fifth of the registered voters from each
subdistrict, or fifty registered voters from each
subdistrict, whichever is less, within the subject
district. The petition shall be verified by at least one of
the signers thereof and shall be served upon the board of
directors of the district as provided by law. The district
shall be a party, and if the board of directors in its
discretion determines that such dissolution is not in the
public interest, the district shall oppose such petition and
pay all cost and expense thereof.
2. Upon the filing of the petition, the same shall be
presented to the circuit court, and such court shall fix a
date for a hearing on such petition, as provided in this
section. Thereupon, the clerk of the court shall give
notice of the filing of the petition in some newspaper of
general circulation in the county in which the proceedings
are pending, and if the district extends into any other
county or counties, such notice shall also be published in
some newspaper of general circulation in such other county
or counties. The notice shall contain a description of the
subject boundary lines of the district and the general
purposes of the petition, and shall set forth the date fixed

SB 1284 3
for the hearing on the petition, which shall not be less
than seven nor more than twenty-one days after the date of
the last publication of the notice and shall be on some
regular judicial day of the court wherein the petition is
pending. Such notice shall be signed by the clerk of the
circuit court and shall be published in three successive
issues of a weekly newspaper or in twenty successive issues
of a daily newspaper.
3. The court, for good cause shown, may continue the
case or the hearing thereon from time to time until final
disposition thereof.
4. Exceptions to the dissolution of a district may be
made by any voter or landowner of the district, and by the
district as herein provided; such exceptions shall be filed
not less than five days prior to the date set for the
hearing on the petition. Such exceptions shall specify the
grounds upon which the exceptions are filed and the court
shall take them into consideration in passing upon the
petition and shall also consider the evidence in support of
the petition and in support of the exceptions made. Unless
petitioners prove that there is an agreement for sale of the
district's assets entered into by the board of directors
that would permit all debts and financial obligations of the
district [can] be paid in full upon dissolution and provide
for the continuation of water supply to the inhabitants of
the district, the petition shall be dismissed at the cost of
the petitioners.
5. Should the court find that it would not be to the
public interest to dissolve a district, the petition shall
be dismissed at the costs of the petitioners. If, however,
the court should find in favor of the petitioners, the court
shall enter its interlocutory decree of dissolution which

SB 1284 4
decree shall provide for the submission of the question to
the voters of the district in substantially the following
form:
Shall ______ Public Water Supply District be dissolved
and its assets sold to _______ which shall thereafter be the
water supplier?
6. The decree of dissolution shall not become final
and conclusive until it shall have been submitted to the
voters residing within the boundaries described in such
decree and until it shall have been assented to by a
majority of two-thirds of the voters of the district voting
on the proposition. At their discretion, the board of
directors may approve a change in the vote threshold to a
majority of four-sevenths of the voters of the district
voting on the proposition. The decree shall provide for the
submission of the question and shall fix the date thereof.
The returns shall be certified by the election authority to
the circuit court having jurisdiction in the case and the
100 court shall thereupon enter its order canvassing the returns
101 and declaring the result of such election.
102 7. If, upon canvass and declaration, it is found and
103 determined that the question shall have been assented to by
104 [a majority of two-thirds of the voters of the district
105 voting on such proposition] the number of voters required
106 under subsection 6 of this section then the court shall, in
107 such order declaring the result of the election, enter a
108 further order declaring the decree of dissolution to be
109 final and conclusive. In the event, however, that the court
110 should find that the question had not been assented to by
111 the majority required, the court shall enter a further order
112 declaring such decree of dissolution to be void and of no
113 effect. No appeal shall lie from any of the aforesaid

SB 1284 5
114 orders. In the event that the court declares the decree of
115 dissolution to be final, as provided in this section, the
116 clerk of the circuit court shall file certified copies of
117 such decree of dissolution and of such final order with the
118 secretary of state of the state of Missouri, and with the
119 recorder of deeds of the county or counties in which the
120 district is situate and with the clerk of the county
121 commission of the county or counties in which the district
122 is situate.
123 8. Notwithstanding anything in this section to the
124 contrary, no district shall be dissolved until after all of
125 its debts shall have been paid, and the court, in its decree
126 of dissolution, shall provide for the disposition of the
127 property of the district.
✓